California, session 20252026, SB374.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33318.2 of the Education Code is amended to read:33318.2. (a) The department shall, on or before March 1, 2025, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, provide a report to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the Legislature on the number and types of reports that local educational agencies are required to annually submit. The report shall include all of the following:(1) Information on each type of report, including if the report is required by a particular program.(2) The purpose of each report.(3) Recommendations for both of the following:(A) Which reports can be consolidated or eliminated to reduce the total number of reports local educational agencies are required to annually complete.(B) Which reports can be truncated to shorten any reports local educational agencies are required to annually complete.(C) In determining recommendations pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the department shall seek voluntary input from a diverse array of local educational agencies that vary in size, type, geographic location, and pupil and staff demographics.(b) Within 30 days of receiving a report from the department pursuant to subdivision (a), the Assembly and Senate Education committees, the Assembly Committee on Budget, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and any other relevant subcommittees are encouraged to hold a hearing to allow for the Superintendent to present the report.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the information collected for reports pursuant to this section will help alleviate future burdens and costs on local educational agencies.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 52064.3 of the Education Code is repealed.